Nebraska, session 109, LB984.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB984 LB984
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 42-102, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
42-102 No marriage license shall be granted unless both parties are
eighteen years of age or older. At the time of the marriage the male must
be of the age of seventeen years or upward, and the female of the age of
seventeen years or upward. No person who is afflicted with a venereal
disease shall marry in this state.
Sec. 2. Section 42-107, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
42-107 If it appears the required proof is not given, if it shall
appear that either of the parties is legally incompetent to enter into
such contract or that there is any impediment in the way, or if either
party is younger than eighteen years of age a minor and the consent
mentioned in section 42-105 shall not be given, the county clerk shall
not refuse to grant a license.
Sec. 3. Section 43-4809, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-4809 (1) The minor has the burden of proving by clear and
convincing evidence that the requirements for ordering emancipation under
this section have been met. Prior to entering a judgment of emancipation,
the court shall advise the minor of the consequences of emancipation,
including, but not limited to, the benefits and services available to an
emancipated minor and the risks involved with being emancipated. Such
advisements shall include, at a minimum, the words to the following
effect:
(a) If you become emancipated, you will have some of the rights that
come with adulthood. These rights include: Handling your own affairs;
living where you choose; entering into contracts; keeping and spending
your money; making decisions regarding your own health care, medical
care, dental care, and mental health care, without parental knowledge;
enlisting in the military without your parent’s consent; marrying without
-2-

LB984 LB984
2026 2026
your parent’s consent; applying for public assistance; suing someone or
being sued; enrolling in school or college; and owning real property;
(b) Even if you are emancipated, you still must: Stay in school as
required by Nebraska law; be subject to child labor laws and work permit
rules limiting the number of hours you can work; and be of legal age to
consume alcohol; and
(c) When you become emancipated: You lose your right to have
financial support for basic living expenses for food, clothing, and
shelter, and health care paid for by your parents or guardian; your
parents or guardian will no longer be legally or financially responsible
if you injure someone; and being emancipated does not automatically make
you eligible for public assistance or benefits.
(2) If, after hearing, the court determines that emancipation is in
the best interests of the minor and that the minor understands his or her
rights and responsibilities under sections 43-4801 to 43-4812 as an
emancipated minor, the court shall enter a judgment of emancipation. In
making its determination regarding the petition for emancipation, the
court shall determine whether the petitioner has proven each of the facts
set forth in subdivision (9) of section 43-4803.
Sec. 4. Section 43-4810, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-4810 (1) A judgment of emancipation removes the disability of
minority insofar as that disability may affect: (a) Establishment of his
or her own residence; (b) incurring indebtedness or contractual
obligations of any kind; (c) consenting to medical, dental, or
psychiatric care without the consent, knowledge, or liability of parents
or a guardian; (d) enlisting in the military without a parent’s or
guardian's consent; (e) marrying without a parent’s or guardian's
consent; (f) being individually eligible for public assistance; (f) (g)
the litigation and settlement of controversies; (g) (h) enrolling in any
school or college; and (h) (i) acquiring, encumbering, and conveying
-3-

LB984 LB984
2026 2026
property or any interest therein. For the purposes described in this
subsection, the minor shall be considered in law as an adult and any
obligation or benefit he or she incurs is enforceable by and against such
minor without regard to his or her minority.
(2) A minor emancipated by court order shall be considered to have
the rights and responsibilities of an adult, except for those specific
constitutional and statutory age requirements regarding voting, use of
alcoholic beverages, gambling, use of tobacco, and other health and
safety regulations relevant to the minor because of his or her age.
(3) The emancipated minor shall be provided a certified copy of the
judgment of emancipation at the time the judgment is entered. Upon
presentation of the judgment of emancipation, a third party shall be
allowed to retain a copy of the same as proof of the minor’s ability to
act as stated in this section.
(4) Unless otherwise provided in the judgment of emancipation, the
judgment of emancipation shall explicitly suspend any order regarding
custody, parenting time, or support of the minor and be reported by the
district court clerk to the jurisdiction that issued such order.
Sec. 5. Original sections 42-102 and 42-107, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 43-4809 and 43-4810, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 6. The following section is outright repealed: Section 42-105,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-4-